Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1584
Regional housing agency; evidence of establishment.

A duly certified copy of the resolution or ordinance establishing a regional housing agency shall, in any proceeding in which such evidence may be required, be conclusive evidence that such agency has been properly established and is authorized to transact business and exercise its powers under the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 13.